District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-101.157

Close corporations — Formation of a close corporation.

Repealed.

History

June 8, 1954, ch. 269, § 157
as added Sept. 10, 1992, D.C. Law 9-144, § 4(ddd), 39 DCR 4863
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(j), 58 DCR 1720

Prior Codifications

2001 Ed., § 29-101.157.
1981 Ed., § 29-399.56.